Florida, session 2026, SB7024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 119.0725, Florida Statutes, is amended 28 to read: 29 119.0725âAgency cybersecurity information; public records 30 exemption; public meetings exemption.â 31 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 32 (a)ââBreachâ means unauthorized access of data or in 33 electronic form containing personal information. Good faith 34 access of data or personal information by an employee or agent 35 of an agency does not constitute a breach, provided that the 36 data or information is not used for a purpose unrelated to the 37 business or subject to further unauthorized use. 38 (b)ââCritical infrastructureâ means existing and proposed 39 information technology and operational technology systems and 40 assets, whether physical or virtual, the incapacity or 41 destruction of which would negatively affect security, economic 42 security, public health, or public safety. 43 (c)ââCybersecurityâ means the protection afforded to 44 information technology or operational technology in order to 45 attain the applicable objectives of preserving the 46 confidentiality, integrity, and availability of such 47 technologies, data, and information has the same meaning as in 48 s. 282.0041. 49 (d)ââDataâ has the same meaning as in s. 282.0041. 50 (e)ââIncidentâ means a violation or imminent threat of 51 violation, whether such violation is accidental or deliberate, 52 of an agencyâs cybersecurity, information technology, or 53 operational technology resources, security, policies, or 54 practices. As used in this paragraph, the term âimminent threat 55 of violationâ means a situation in which the agency has a 56 factual basis for believing that a specific incident is about to 57 occur. 58 (f)ââInformation technologyâ has the same meaning as in s. 59 282.0041. 60 (g)ââLogin credentialsâ means information used to 61 authenticate a userâs identity or otherwise authorize access 62 when logging into a computer, computer system, computer network, 63 electronic device, or online user account accessible over the 64 Internet through a mobile device, a website, or any other 65 electronic means, or for authentication or password or account 66 recovery. 67 (h)ââOperational technologyâ means the hardware and 68 software that cause or detect a change through the direct 69 monitoring or control of physical devices, systems, processes, 70 or events. 71 (i)ââPublic-facing portalâ means a web portal or computer 72 application accessible by the public over the Internet, whether 73 through a mobile device, website, or other electronic means. 74 (2)âThe following information held by an agency is 75 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 76 of the State Constitution: 77 (a)âCoverage limits and deductible or self-insurance 78 amounts of insurance or other risk mitigation coverages acquired 79 for the protection of information technology systems, 80 operational technology systems, or data of an agency. 81 (b)âInformation relating to critical infrastructure. 82 (b)(c)âCybersecurity incident information reported pursuant 83 to s. 282.318 or s. 282.3185. 84 (c)(d)âNetwork schematics, hardware and software 85 configurations, or encryption information, or any information 86 that identifies detection, investigation, or response practices 87 related to for suspected or confirmed cybersecurity incidents, 88 including suspected or confirmed breaches, if the disclosure of 89 such information could would facilitate unauthorized access to 90 or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or destruction of 91 data, information, or existing or proposed information 92 technology or operational technology: 93 1.âData or information, whether physical or virtual; or 94 2.âInformation technology resources, which include an 95 agencyâs existing or proposed information technology systems. 96 (d)âInformation relating to processes or practices designed 97 to protect data, information, or existing or proposed 98 information technology or operational technology if the 99 disclosure of such information could facilitate unauthorized 100 access to or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 101 destruction of such data, information, or technology. 102 (e)âPortions of risk assessments, evaluation, audits, and 103 other reports of an agencyâs cybersecurity program if the 104 disclosure of such information could facilitate unauthorized 105 access to or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 106 destruction of data, information, or existing or proposed 107 information technology or operational technology. 108 (f)âLogin credentials. 109 (g)âInternet protocol addresses, geolocation data, and 110 other information that describes the location, computer, 111 computer system, or computer network from which a user accesses 112 a public-facing portal, and the dates and times that a user 113 accesses a public-facing portal. 114 (h)âAgency-produced data processing software that is 115 sensitive. 116 (i)âInsurance and self-insurance coverage limits and 117 deductibles, as well as any other risk mitigation coverages 118 acquired for the protection of information technology, 119 operational technology, or data of an agency. 120 (3)âAny portion of a meeting that would reveal information 121 made confidential and exempt under subsection (2) is exempt from 122 s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. An 123 exempt portion of a meeting may not be off the record and must 124 be recorded and transcribed. The recording and transcript are 125 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 126 of the State Constitution. 127 (4)âThe public records exemptions contained in this section 128 apply to information held by an agency before, on, or after the 129 effective date of the exemptions July 1, 2022. 130 (5)(a)âInformation made confidential and exempt pursuant to 131 this section shall be made available to a law enforcement 132 agency, the Auditor General, the Cybercrime Office of the 133 Department of Law Enforcement, the Florida Digital Service 134 within the Department of Management Services, and, for agencies 135 under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector 136 General. 137 (b)âSuch confidential and exempt information may be 138 disclosed by an agency in the furtherance of its official duties 139 and responsibilities or to another agency or governmental entity 140 in the furtherance of the agencyâs or governmental entityâs 141 official its statutory duties and responsibilities. 142 (6)âAgencies may report information about cybersecurity 143 incidents in the aggregate. 144 (7)âThis section is subject to the Open Government Sunset 145 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 146 on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 147 through reenactment by the Legislature. 148 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 15.16, Florida 149 Statutes, is amended to read: 150 15.16âReproduction of records; admissibility in evidence; 151 electronic receipt and transmission of records; certification; 152 acknowledgment.â 153 (3)(a)âThe Department of State may cause to be received 154 electronically any records that are required or authorized to be 155 filed with it pursuant to chapter 48, chapter 55, chapter 117, 156 chapter 118, chapter 495, chapter 605, chapter 606, chapter 607, 157 chapter 610, chapter 617, chapter 620, chapter 621, chapter 679, 158 chapter 713, or chapter 865, through facsimile or other 159 electronic transfers, for the purpose of filing such records. 160 The originals of all such electronically transmitted records 161 must be executed in the manner provided in paragraph (5)(b). The 162 receipt of such electronic transfer constitutes delivery to the 163 department as required by law. The department may use electronic 164 transmissions for purposes of notice in the administration of 165 chapters 48, 55, 117, 118, 495, 605, 606, 607, 610, 617, 620, 166 621, 679, and 713 and s. 865.09. The Department of State may 167 collect e-mail addresses for purposes of notice and 168 communication in the performance of its duties and may require 169 filers and registrants to furnish such e-mail addresses when 170 presenting documents for filing. 171 (b)âThe department may implement a password-protected 172 system for any record electronically received pursuant to 173 paragraph (a) and may require filers to produce supplemental 174 materials to use such system, including, but not limited to, an 175 original signature of the filer and verification of credentials. 176 The department may also implement a password-protected system 177 that allows entities organized under the chapters specified in 178 paragraph (a) to identify authorized account holders for the 179 purpose of electronically filing records related to the entity. 180 If the department implements such a system, it must send to each 181 e-mail address on file with the Division of Corporations on 182 January 1, 2024, a code to participate in a password-protected 183 system. The department may require verification of the identity 184 of an authorized account holder before the account holder is 185 authorized to electronically file a record with the department. 186 (c)1.âE-mail addresses collected by the Department of State 187 pursuant to this subsection are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 188 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption applies 189 to e-mail addresses held by the Department of State before, on, 190 or after the effective date of the exemption. 191 2.âSecure login credentials held by the Department of State 192 for the purpose of allowing a person to electronically file 193 records under this subsection are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 194 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption 195 applies to secure login credentials held by the Department of 196 State before, on, or after the effective date of the exemption. 197 For purposes of this subparagraph, the term âsecure login 198 credentialsâ means information held by the department for 199 purposes of authenticating a user logging into a user account on 200 a computer, a computer system, a computer network, or an 201 electronic device; an online user account accessible over the 202 Internet, whether through a mobile device, a website, or any 203 other electronic means; or information used for authentication 204 or password recovery. 205 3.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 206 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 207 on October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 208 through reenactment by the Legislature. 209 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 24.1051, Florida 210 Statutes, is amended to read: 211 24.1051âExemptions from inspection or copying of public 212 records.â 213 (1)(a)âThe following information held by the department is 214 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 215 of the State Constitution: 216 1.âInformation that, if released, could harm the security 217 or integrity of the department, including: 218 a.âInformation relating to the security of the departmentâs 219 technologies, processes, and practices designed to protect 220 networks, computers, data processing software, data, and data 221 systems from attack, damage, or unauthorized access. This sub 222 subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act 223 in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 224 2, 2027, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 225 reenactment by the Legislature. 226 b.âSecurity information or information that would reveal 227 security measures of the department, whether physical or 228 virtual. 229 b.c.âInformation about lottery games, promotions, tickets, 230 and ticket stock, including information concerning the 231 description, design, production, printing, packaging, shipping, 232 delivery, storage, and validation of such games, promotions, 233 tickets, and stock. 234 c.d.âInformation concerning terminals, machines, and 235 devices that issue tickets. 236 2.âInformation that must be maintained as confidential in 237 order for the department to participate in a multistate lottery 238 association or game. 239 3.âPersonal identifying information obtained by the 240 department when processing background investigations of current 241 or potential retailers or vendors. 242 4.âFinancial information about an entity which is not 243 publicly available and is provided to the department in 244 connection with its review of the financial responsibility of 245 the entity pursuant to s. 24.111 or s. 24.112, provided that the 246 entity marks such information as confidential. However, 247 financial information related to any contract or agreement, or 248 an addendum thereto, with the department, including the amount 249 of money paid, any payment structure or plan, expenditures, 250 incentives, bonuses, fees, and penalties, shall be public 251 record. 252 (b)âThis exemption is remedial in nature, and it is the 253 intent of the Legislature that this exemption apply to 254 information held by the department before, on, or after May 14, 255 2019. 256 (c)âInformation made confidential and exempt under this 257 subsection may be released to other governmental entities as 258 needed in connection with the performance of their duties. The 259 receiving governmental entity shall maintain the confidential 260 and exempt status of such information. 261 Section 4.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 262 101.5607, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 263 101.5607âDepartment of State to maintain voting system 264 information; prepare software.â 265 (1) 266 (d)âSection 119.0725(2)(h) 119.071(1)(f) applies to all 267 software on file with the Department of State. 268 Section 5.âSection 106.0706, Florida Statutes, is amended 269 to read: 270 106.0706âElectronic filing of campaign finance reports; 271 public records exemption.â 272 (1)âAll user identifications and passwords held by the 273 Department of State pursuant to s. 106.0705 are confidential and 274 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 275 Constitution. 276 (2)(a)âInformation entered in the electronic filing system 277 for purposes of generating a report pursuant to s. 106.0705 is 278 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 279 Constitution. 280 (2)(b)âInformation entered in the electronic filing system 281 is no longer exempt once the report is generated and filed with 282 the Division of Elections. 283 Section 6.âSubsection (6) of section 112.31446, Florida 284 Statutes, is amended to read: 285 112.31446âElectronic filing system for financial 286 disclosure.â 287 (6)(a)âAll secure login credentials held by the commission 288 for the purpose of allowing access to the electronic filing 289 system are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the 290 State Constitution. 291 (b)âInformation entered in the electronic filing system for 292 purposes of financial disclosure is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 293 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Information entered 294 in the electronic filing system is no longer exempt once the 295 disclosure of financial interests or statement of financial 296 interests is submitted to the commission or, in the case of a 297 candidate, filed with a qualifying officer, whichever occurs 298 first. 299 Section 7.âParagraph (g) of subsection (1) of section 300 119.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 301 119.07âInspection and copying of records; photographing 302 public records; fees; exemptions.â 303 (1) 304 (g)âIn any civil action in which an exemption to this 305 section is asserted, if the exemption is alleged to exist under 306 or by virtue of s. 119.071(1)(d) or (f), (2)(d), (e), or (f), or 307 (4)(c), or s. 119.0725(2)(h), the public record or part thereof 308 in question shall be submitted to the court for an inspection in 309 camera. If an exemption is alleged to exist under or by virtue 310 of s. 119.071(2)(c), an inspection in camera is discretionary 311 with the court. If the court finds that the asserted exemption 312 is not applicable, it shall order the public record or part 313 thereof in question to be immediately produced for inspection or 314 copying as requested by the person seeking such access. 315 Section 8.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 316 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 317 119.071âGeneral exemptions from inspection or copying of 318 public records.â 319 (1)âAGENCY ADMINISTRATION.â 320 (f)âAgency-produced data processing software that is 321 sensitive is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of 322 the State Constitution. The designation of agency-produced 323 software as sensitive does not prohibit an agency head from 324 sharing or exchanging such software with another public agency. 325 Section 9.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 326 119.0712, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 327 119.0712âExecutive branch agency-specific exemptions from 328 inspection or copying of public records.â 329 (2)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 330 (f)1.âSecure login credentials held by the Department of 331 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles are exempt from s. 119.07(1) 332 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption 333 applies to secure login credentials held by the department 334 before, on, or after the effective date of the exemption. For 335 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âsecure login 336 credentialsâ means information held by the department for 337 purposes of authenticating a user logging into a user account on 338 a computer, a computer system, a computer network, or an 339 electronic device; an online user account accessible over the 340 Internet, whether through a mobile device, a website, or any 341 other electronic means; or information used for authentication 342 or password recovery. 343 2.âInternet protocol addresses, geolocation data, and other 344 information held by the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 345 Vehicles which describes the location, computer, computer 346 system, or computer network from which a user accesses a public 347 facing portal, and the dates and times that a user accesses a 348 public-facing portal, are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 349 Art. I of the State Constitution. This exemption applies to such 350 information held by the department before, on, or after the 351 effective date of the exemption. For purposes of this 352 subparagraph, the term âpublic-facing portalâ means a web portal 353 or computer application accessible by the public over the 354 Internet, whether through a mobile device, website, or other 355 electronic means, which is established for administering chapter 356 319, chapter 320, chapter 322, chapter 328, or any other 357 provision of law conferring duties upon the department. 358 3.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 359 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 360 on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 361 through reenactment by the Legislature. 362 Section 10.âSubsection (5) of section 119.0713, Florida 363 Statutes, is amended to read: 364 119.0713âLocal government agency exemptions from inspection 365 or copying of public records.â 366 (5)(a)âCustomer meter-derived data and billing information 367 in increments less than one billing cycle The following 368 information held by a utility owned or operated by a unit of 369 local government are is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), 370 Art. I of the State Constitution: 371 1.âInformation related to the security of the technology, 372 processes, or practices of a utility owned or operated by a unit 373 of local government that are designed to protect the utilityâs 374 networks, computers, programs, and data from attack, damage, or 375 unauthorized access, which information, if disclosed, would 376 facilitate the alteration, disclosure, or destruction of such 377 data or information technology resources. 378 2.âInformation related to the security of existing or 379 proposed information technology systems or industrial control 380 technology systems of a utility owned or operated by a unit of 381 local government, which, if disclosed, would facilitate 382 unauthorized access to, and alteration or destruction of, such 383 systems in a manner that would adversely impact the safe and 384 reliable operation of the systems and the utility. 385 3.âCustomer meter-derived data and billing information in 386 increments less than one billing cycle. 387 (a)(b)âThis exemption applies to such data and information 388 held by a utility owned or operated by a unit of local 389 government before, on, or after the effective date of this 390 exemption. 391 (b)(c)âThis subsection is Subparagraphs (a)1. and 2. are 392 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance 393 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2027, 394 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 395 Legislature. 396 Section 11.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 397 119.0714, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 398 119.0714âCourt files; court records; official records.â 399 (1)âCOURT FILES.âNothing in this chapter shall be construed 400 to exempt from s. 119.07(1) a public record that was made a part 401 of a court file and that is not specifically closed by order of 402 court, except: 403 (b)âData processing software as provided in s. 404 119.0725(2)(h) s. 119.071(1)(f). 405 Section 12.âParagraphs (d), (e), and (g) of subsection (4) 406 and subsections (5) through (9) of section 282.318, Florida 407 Statutes, are amended to read: 408 282.318âCybersecurity.â 409 (4)âEach state agency head shall, at a minimum: 410 (d)âConduct, and update every 3 years, a comprehensive risk 411 assessment, which may be completed by a private sector vendor, 412 to determine the security threats to the data, information, and 413 information technology resources, including mobile devices and 414 print environments, of the agency. The risk assessment must 415 comply with the risk assessment methodology developed by the 416 department and is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 417 except that such information shall be available to the Auditor 418 General, the Florida Digital Service within the department, the 419 Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, and, for 420 state agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief 421 Inspector General. If a private sector vendor is used to 422 complete a comprehensive risk assessment, it must attest to the 423 validity of the risk assessment findings. 424 (e)âDevelop, and periodically update, written internal 425 policies and procedures, which include procedures for reporting 426 cybersecurity incidents and breaches to the Cybercrime Office of 427 the Department of Law Enforcement and the Florida Digital 428 Service within the department. Such policies and procedures must 429 be consistent with the rules, guidelines, and processes 430 established by the department to ensure the security of the 431 data, information, and information technology resources of the 432 agency. The internal policies and procedures that, if disclosed, 433 could facilitate the unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 434 destruction of data or information technology resources are 435 confidential information and exempt from s. 119.07(1), except 436 that such information shall be available to the Auditor General, 437 the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, the 438 Florida Digital Service within the department, and, for state 439 agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief 440 Inspector General. 441 (g)âEnsure that periodic internal audits and evaluations of 442 the agencyâs cybersecurity program for the data, information, 443 and information technology resources of the agency are 444 conducted. The results of such audits and evaluations are 445 confidential information and exempt from s. 119.07(1), except 446 that such information shall be available to the Auditor General, 447 the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, the 448 Florida Digital Service within the department, and, for agencies 449 under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector 450 General. 451 (5)âThe portions of risk assessments, evaluations, external 452 audits, and other reports of a state agencyâs cybersecurity 453 program for the data, information, and information technology 454 resources of the state agency which are held by a state agency 455 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 456 I of the State Constitution if the disclosure of such portions 457 of records would facilitate unauthorized access to or the 458 unauthorized modification, disclosure, or destruction of: 459 (a)âData or information, whether physical or virtual; or 460 (b)âInformation technology resources, which include: 461 1.âInformation relating to the security of the agencyâs 462 technologies, processes, and practices designed to protect 463 networks, computers, data processing software, and data from 464 attack, damage, or unauthorized access; or 465 2.âSecurity information, whether physical or virtual, which 466 relates to the agencyâs existing or proposed information 467 technology systems. 468 469 For purposes of this subsection, âexternal auditâ means an audit 470 that is conducted by an entity other than the state agency that 471 is the subject of the audit. 472 (6)âThose portions of a public meeting as specified in s. 473 286.011 which would reveal records which are confidential and 474 exempt under subsection (5) are exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 475 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. No exempt portion of an 476 exempt meeting may be off the record. All exempt portions of 477 such meeting shall be recorded and transcribed. Such recordings 478 and transcripts are confidential and exempt from disclosure 479 under s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 480 Constitution unless a court of competent jurisdiction, after an 481 in camera review, determines that the meeting was not restricted 482 to the discussion of data and information made confidential and 483 exempt by this section. In the event of such a judicial 484 determination, only that portion of the recording and transcript 485 which reveals nonexempt data and information may be disclosed to 486 a third party. 487 (7)âThe portions of records made confidential and exempt in 488 subsections (5) and (6) shall be available to the Auditor 489 General, the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law 490 Enforcement, the Florida Digital Service within the department, 491 and, for agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the 492 Chief Inspector General. Such portions of records may be made 493 available to a local government, another state agency, or a 494 federal agency for cybersecurity purposes or in furtherance of 495 the state agencyâs official duties. 496 (8)âThe exemptions contained in subsections (5) and (6) 497 apply to records held by a state agency before, on, or after the 498 effective date of this exemption. 499 (9)âSubsections (5) and (6) are subject to the Open 500 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and 501 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2026, unless reviewed and 502 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 503 Section 13.âSection 627.352, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 504 Section 14.âSection 1004.055, Florida Statutes, is 505 repealed. 506 Section 15.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 507 necessity that the following information held by an agency be 508 made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 509 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution: 510 (a)âNetwork schematics, hardware and software 511 configurations, encryption information, or any information that 512 identifies detection, investigation, or response practices 513 relating to cybersecurity incidents, including breaches, if the 514 disclosure of such information could facilitate unauthorized 515 access to or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 516 destruction of data, information, or existing or proposed 517 information technology or operational technology. 518 (b)âInformation relating to processes or practices designed 519 to protect data, information, or existing or proposed 520 information technology or operational technology if the 521 disclosure of such information could facilitate unauthorized 522 access to or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 523 destruction of such data, information, or technology. 524 (c)âPortions of risk assessments, evaluations, audits, and 525 other reports of an agencyâs cybersecurity program if the 526 disclosure of such information could facilitate unauthorized 527 access to or unauthorized modification, disclosure, or 528 destruction of data, information, or existing or proposed 529 information technology or operational technology. 530 (d)âLogin credentials. 531 (e)âInternet protocol addresses, geolocation data, and 532 other information that describes the location, computer, 533 computer system, or computer network from which a user accesses 534 a public-facing portal, and the dates and times that a user 535 accesses a public-facing portal. 536 (f)âAgency-produced data processing software that is 537 sensitive. 538 (g)âInsurance and self-insurance coverage limits and 539 deductibles, as well as any other risk mitigation coverages, 540 acquired for the protection of information technology, 541 operational technology, or data of an agency. 542 (2)âThe Legislature finds that release of the information 543 described in subsection (1) could place an agency at greater 544 risk of breaches, cybersecurity incidents, and ransomware 545 attacks. Network schematics, hardware and software 546 configurations, encryption information, or any information that 547 identifies detection, investigation, or response practices for 548 cybersecurity incidents, including breaches, reveals how an 549 agencyâs information technology and operational technology 550 systems are structured and defended. Disclosure of such 551 information could enable a malicious actor to map system 552 architecture, identify vulnerabilities, and bypass security 553 controls. Information describing processes or practices designed 554 to protect data, information, or existing or proposed 555 information technology or operational technology could similarly 556 be used to exploit weaknesses and predict defensive actions. 557 Portions of risk assessments, evaluations, audits, and other 558 reports of an agencyâs cybersecurity program routinely include 559 descriptions of vulnerabilities, testing results, and 560 recommendations. Disclosure of such information would 561 substantially increase the likelihood of a successful 562 cyberattack. Login credentials are a foundational security 563 control, and disclosure of such information could allow 564 malicious actors to authenticate themselves in order to access 565 government systems, impersonate legitimate users, and access 566 personal identifying and other sensitive information. Internet 567 protocol addresses, geolocation data, and other information that 568 describes the location, computer, computer system, or computer 569 network from which a user accesses a public-facing portal, and 570 the dates and times that a user accesses a public-facing portal, 571 could be used to track usage patterns, identify remote access 572 points, or monitor portal vulnerabilities. Sensitive agency 573 produced data processing software can reveal the inner workings 574 of security controls, authentication mechanisms, or automated 575 processes that malicious actors can use to exploit weaknesses in 576 security measures. If information related to coverage limits and 577 deductibles of cybersecurity insurance were disclosed, it could 578 give cybercriminals an understanding of the monetary sum an 579 agency can afford or may be willing to pay as a result of a 580 ransomware attack at the expense of taxpayers. Accordingly, the 581 Legislature finds that the disclosure of such sensitive 582 cybersecurity-related information would significantly impair the 583 administration of vital governmental programs. 584 (3)âThe Legislature also finds that it is a public 585 necessity that any portion of a meeting which would reveal the 586 confidential and exempt information in subsection (1) be made 587 exempt from s. 286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article 588 I of the State Constitution, and that any recordings and 589 transcripts of the closed portion of a meeting be made 590 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 591 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The failure to 592 close that portion of a meeting at which confidential and exempt 593 information would be revealed, and prevent the disclosure of the 594 recordings and transcripts of those portions of a meeting, would 595 defeat the purpose of the underlying public records exemption 596 and could result in the release of highly sensitive information 597 related to the cybersecurity of an agency system. 598 (4)âFor these reasons, the Legislature finds that these 599 public records and public meetings exemptions are of the utmost 600 importance and are a public necessity. 601 Section 16.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.